Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska17-951
Facilities; maintenance and improvement; tax authorized.

The mayor and city council of any city of the second class or the village board of trustees of any village which has already acquired or hereafter acquires land for park purposes or recreational facilities or which has already built or hereafter builds swimming pools, recreational facilities, or dams may each year make and levy a tax upon the taxable value of all the taxable property in such city or village. The levy shall be collected and put into the city or village treasury and shall constitute the park and recreation fund of such city or village. The funds so levied and collected shall be used for amusements, for laying out, improving, and beautifying such parks, for maintaining, improving, managing, and beautifying such swimming pools, recreational facilities, or dams, and for the payment of salaries and wages of persons employed in the performance of such labor.

Laws 1937, c. 35, § 4, p. 163;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 17-593;

R.S.1943, § 17-951;

Laws 1953, c. 36, § 1, p. 127;

Laws 1969, c. 86, § 4, p. 432;

Laws 1979, LB 187, § 62;

Laws 1992, LB 719A, § 63;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 283.